Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1625
Price of propane; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the price of propane shall always be determined by market forces. The council shall take no action to interfere in any manner with the free market process.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 25.